Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-736
Registration of order for enforcement.

A support order or an income withholding order issued in another state or a foreign support order may be registered in this state for enforcement.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 36;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 34.